Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-541
Sanitary district; activities; discontinuance; powers of county board; succession.

Except as otherwise provided in section 31-543, the county board of the county within which such district is located shall take possession of all rights and personal property, books, papers and records of such district, and shall discharge the duties within the territorial limits of such district imposed by law upon the district. For the discharge of such services the county board may employ such officers, servants and agents as may be necessary in the manner provided by law.

Laws 1941, c. 56, § 6, p. 257;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-635;

R.S.1943, § 31-541;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 335.

In case of discontinuance of district, county board discharges duties of district. Lang v. Sanitary District of Norfolk, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).